District of Columbia statutes.
7-1204.04

Redisclosure.

Redisclosure of any mental health information disclosed pursuant to this subchapter shall be governed by order of the court or, if no order is issued, by the rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 404, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2034.
1973 Ed., § 6-1631.